Arkansas, session 2025, SB348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-147(b), concerning reimbursement for
diagnostic laboratory services is amended to read as follows:
(b) The program shall set the annual cap for:
(1) Diagnostic laboratory services, not including radiology
services, of at least:
(A) Five five hundred dollars ($500); or
(B) One thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) if the
beneficiary is diagnosed with chronic pain or is being treated for pain
management; and
(2) Radiology services of at least five hundred dollars ($500).

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Initial rules.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement this act.
*JMB227*
02/27/2025 2:19:49 PM JMB227

SB348
(b) When adopting the initial rules to implement this act, the final
rules shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-
204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(c) The department shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an urgent need to
improve efficiency in diagnostic laboratory services within the Arkansas
Medicaid Program; that beneficiaries of the Arkansas Medicaid Program are
currently not being monitored adequately due to the low annual reimbursement
cap on diagnostic laboratory services; that inadequate monitoring due to the
low annual reimbursement cap on diagnostic laboratory services contributes to
the opioid epidemic through misuse and diversion of medications; that
inadequate monitoring due to the low annual reimbursement cap on diagnostic
laboratory services also contributes to increased emergency room visits; that
the Department of Human Services needs adequate time to draft rules, federal
waivers, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authorization to ensure
that this act can be effective; and that this act is necessary to ensure the
health and safety of beneficiaries of the Arkansas Medicaid Program and to
enhance the patient care for beneficiaries of the Arkansas Medicaid Program.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary
for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on July 1, 2025.







02/27/2025 2:19:49 PM JMB227